Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62Q.5291] DISPENSING FEE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Minimum dispensing fee. new text end new text begin A health plan that provides prescription coverage must pay, for the pharmacy service in dispensing a prescribed drug, a dispensing fee in an amount at least equal to the dispensing fee in section 256B.0625, subdivision 13e, paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Medical assistance and MinnesotaCare excluded. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to managed care plans or county-based purchasing plans when the plan provides coverage to public health care program enrollees under chapter 256B or 256L. new text end